California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(B) The development is privately owned housing, is not exempt from ad valorem taxation by reason of any public ownership, and is not financed with direct long-term financing from a public body.

(C) The development is intended for owner-occupancy, which may include a limited-equity housing cooperative as defined in Section 50076.5 of the Health and Safety Code, or cooperative or condominium ownership, rather than for
 rental-occupancy.

(D) The development consists of newly constructed, privately owned, one-to-four family dwellings not located on adjoining sites.

(E) The development consists of existing dwelling units leased by the state public body from the private owner of these dwelling units.

(F) The development consists of the rehabilitation, reconstruction, improvement or addition to, or replacement of, dwelling units of a previously existing low-rent housing project, or a project previously or currently occupied by lower income households, as defined in Section 50079.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(G) The development consists of the acquisition, rehabilitation, reconstruction, improvement, or any combination thereof, of a development which, prior to the date
 of the transaction to acquire, rehabilitate, reconstruct, improve, or any combination thereof, was subject to a contract for federal or state public body assistance for the purpose of providing affordable housing for low-income households and maintains, or enters into, a contract for federal or state public body assistance for the purpose of providing affordable housing for low-income households.

(2) “Tribal entity” shall mean a federally recognized Indian tribe, tribal organization, or urban Indian organization, as defined in Section 1603 of Title 25 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 355.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 5960.45.)
-------------------------------------------

5960.4.

The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 355.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 5960.45.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Children and youth behavioral health initiative act [5961. - 5961.5.]

5961.

(a) This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Children and Youth Behavioral Health Initiative Act.

(b) The Children and Youth Behavioral Health Initiative shall be administered by the California Health and Human Services Agency and its departments, as applicable.

(c) The initiative is intended to transform California’s behavioral health system into an innovative ecosystem in which all children and youth 25 years of age and younger, regardless of payer, are screened, supported, and served for emerging and existing behavioral health needs.

(d) Subject to an appropriation by the Legislature for this
 purpose, the initiative shall include, but need not be limited to, all of the following components:

(1) A behavioral health services and supports virtual platform, as described in Section 5961.1.

(2) School-linked partnership, capacity, and infrastructure grants to qualified entities to support implementation of the initiative for behavioral health services in schools and school-linked settings, as described in Section 5961.2.

(3) Incentive payments to qualifying Medi-Cal managed care plans to implement interventions that increase access to preventive, early intervention, and behavioral health services by school-affiliated behavioral health providers for children in publicly funded childcare and preschool and TK-12 children in public schools, as described in Section 5961.3.

(4) Development and maintenance of a statewide fee schedule for school-linked outpatient mental health and substance use disorder treatment, as described in Section 5961.4.

(5) Development and expansion of evidence-based behavioral health programs, as described in Section 5961.5.

(6) Funding targeted to qualified entities serving individuals 25 years of age and younger through the Behavioral Health Continuum Infrastructure Program, as described in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 5960).

(7) A comprehensive, and culturally and linguistically proficient, public education and social change campaign in support of the initiative.

(8) Investments for behavioral health workforce, education, and
 training to foster broad behavioral health capacity in support of the initiative, including a multiyear plan to launch and implement a statewide school behavioral health counselor system pursuant to Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 127825) of Part 3 of Division 107 of the Health and Safety Code.

(9) Funding targeted to qualified entities serving individuals 25 years of age and younger through the Mental Health Student Services Act, as described in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5886) of Part 4.

(e) Each component of the initiative shall be implemented only if, and to the extent that, the State Department of Health Care Services determines that federal financial participation under the Medi-Cal program is not jeopardized.

(f) For purposes of implementing this chapter, the California Health and Human Services
 Agency, the State Department of Health Care Services, and the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this chapter shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services.

(g) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the State Department of Health Care Services and the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development may implement, interpret, or make specific this chapter, in
 whole or in part, by means of plan letters, information notices, provider bulletins, or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(h) The Legislature finds and declares that this chapter is a state law within the meaning of Section 1621(d) of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 355.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

5961.1.

(a) As a component of the initiative, the State Department of Health Care Services shall procure and oversee a vendor to establish and maintain a behavioral health services and supports virtual platform that integrates behavioral health screenings, application-based supports, and direct behavioral health services to children and youth 25 years of age and younger, regardless of payer.

(b) Any virtual platform established or procured shall include access in all Medi-Cal threshold languages and shall be culturally appropriate to accommodate the diversity of the population and shall be accessible by telephone.

(c) The virtual platform may provide behavioral health services and
 supports, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Regular, automated behavioral health screenings.

(2) Short-term individual counseling, group counseling, and behavioral health peer and coaching supports.

(3) Interactive education, self-monitoring tools, application-based games, video and book suggestions, automated cognitive behavioral therapy, and mindful exercises designed to build skills and enhance wellbeing.

(4) Access to behavioral health peers, coaches, and licensed clinicians.

(5) Referrals to an individual’s commercial health insurance, Medi-Cal managed care plan, county behavioral health, school-linked counselor, or community-based organizations, or other resources for
 higher-level behavioral health services.

(6) Statewide e-consult service to allow primary care pediatric and family practice providers to receive asynchronous support and consultation to manage behavioral health conditions for their patients.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 355.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

5961.2.

(a) As a component of the initiative, the State Department of Health Care Services, or its contracted vendor, may award competitive grants to entities it deems qualified for the following purposes:

(1) To build partnerships, capacity, and infrastructure supporting ongoing school-linked behavioral health services for children and youth 25 years of age and younger.

(2) To expand access to licensed medical and behavioral health professionals, counselors, peer support specialists, community health workers, and certified
 wellness coaches serving children and youth.

(3) To build a statewide, community-based organization provider network for behavioral health prevention and treatment services for children and youth, including those attending institutions of higher education.

(4) To enhance coordination and partnerships with respect to behavioral health prevention and treatment services for children and youth via appropriate data sharing systems.

(b) Subject to subdivision (c), entities eligible to receive grants pursuant to this section may include counties, city mental health authorities, tribal entities, local educational agencies, institutions of higher education, publicly funded childcare and preschools, health care service plans, community-based organizations, and behavioral health providers.

(c) The department shall determine the eligibility criteria, grant application process, and methodology for the distribution of funds appropriated for the purposes described in this section to those entities it deems qualified.

(d) The department shall ensure that grant distribution includes, but is not limited to, rural, urban, and suburban regions and geographic distribution among different age cohorts. Allowable activities shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) Addressing behavioral health disparities while providing linguistically and culturally competent services for children and youth who lack access to adequate behavioral health services or otherwise are difficult to reach.

(2) Supporting administrative costs, including planning,
 project management, training, and technical assistance.

(3) Linking plans, counties, and school districts with local social services and community-based organizations.

(4) Implementing telehealth equipment and virtual systems in schools or near schools.

(5) Implementing data-sharing tools, information technology interfaces, or other technology investments designed to connect to behavioral health services.

(e) Of the funds appropriated for purposes of this section to institutions of higher education, at least two-thirds shall be reserved for California Community Colleges.

(f) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Comprehensive risk contract” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 438.2 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) “Health care service plan” has the same meaning as described in subdivision (f) of Section 1345 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) “Institution of higher education” means the California Community Colleges, the California State University, or the University of California.

(4) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, charter school, the California Schools for the Deaf, and the California School for the Blind.

(5) “Tribal entity” means a federally recognized Indian tribe, tribal organization, or urban Indian
 organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 49.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5961.3.

(a) As a component of the initiative, the State Department of Health Care Services shall make incentive payments to qualifying Medi-Cal managed care plans that meet predefined goals and metrics developed pursuant to subdivision (b) associated with targeted interventions that increase access to preventive, early intervention and behavioral health services by school-affiliated behavioral health providers for K-12 children in schools.

(b) The department, in consultation with the State Department of Education, Medi-Cal managed care plans, county behavioral health departments, local educational agencies, and other affected stakeholders, shall develop the interventions, goals, and metrics used to determine a Medi-Cal managed care plan’s
 eligibility to receive the incentive payments described in this section. Higher incentive payments may be made for activities that increase Medi-Cal reimbursable services provided to children and youth, to reduce health equity gaps, and for services provided to children and youth living in transition, are homeless, or are involved in the child welfare system. Interventions, goals, and metrics include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) Local planning efforts to review existing plans and documents that articulate children and youth needs in the area; compile data; map existing behavioral health providers and resources; identify gaps, disparities, and inequities; and convene stakeholders and develop a framework for a robust and coordinated system of social, emotional, and behavioral health supports for children and youth.

(2) Providing technical assistance to increase
 coordination and partnerships between schools and health care plans to build an integrated continuum of behavioral health services using contracts, a memorandum of understanding, or other agreements.

(3) Developing or piloting behavioral health wellness programs to expand greater prevention and early intervention practices in school settings, such as Mental Health First Aid and Social and Emotional Learning.

(4) Expanding the workforce by using community health workers or peers to expand the surveillance and early intervention of behavioral health issues in school-age children 0 to 25 years of age, inclusive.

(5) Increasing telehealth in schools and ensure students have access to technological equipment.

(6) Implementing school-based suicide prevention
 strategies.

(7) Improving performance and outcomes-based accountability for behavioral health access and quality measures through local student behavioral health dashboards or public reporting.

(8) Increasing access to substance use disorder prevention, early intervention, and treatment.

(c) (1) For each Medi-Cal managed care rating period, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 14105.945, that the department implements this section, the department shall determine the amount of incentive payment earned by each qualifying Medi-Cal managed care plan.

(2) Any incentive payments that are eligible for federal financial participation pursuant to subdivision (e) shall be made in accordance with the requirements for
 incentive arrangements in Section 438.6(b)(2) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations and any associated federal guidance.

(d) Incentive payments made pursuant to this section shall be used to supplement and not supplant existing payments to Medi-Cal managed care plans. In addition to developing new collaborative initiatives, incentive payments shall be used to build on existing school-based partnerships between schools and applicable Medi-Cal plans, including Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery systems.

(e) The department shall seek any necessary federal approvals to claim federal financial participation for the incentive payments to qualifying Medi-Cal managed care plans described in this section. If federal approval is obtained for one or more Medi-Cal managed care rating periods, the department shall implement this section only to the extent that federal financial
 participation is available in that applicable rating period. If federal approval is not obtained for one or more Medi-Cal managed care rating periods, the department may make incentive payments to qualifying Medi-Cal managed care plans as described in this section on a state-only funding basis during the applicable rating period, but only to the extent sufficient funds are appropriated to the department for this purpose and the department determines that federal financial participation for the Medi-Cal program is not otherwise jeopardized as a result.

(f) (1) The department may modify any requirement specified in this section to the extent that it deems the modification necessary to meet the requirements of federal law or regulations, to obtain or maintain federal approval, or to ensure that federal financial participation is available or not otherwise jeopardized. The department shall not propose any modification pursuant
 to this subdivision until the Department of Finance has reviewed and approved a fiscal impact statement.

(2) If the department, after consulting with the State Department of Education, Medi-Cal managed care plans, county behavioral health departments, local educational agencies, and other affected stakeholder entities, determines that the potential modification would be consistent with the goals of this section, the modification may be made in consultation with the Department of Finance and the department shall execute a declaration stating that this determination has been made. The department shall post the declaration on its internet website.

(3) The department shall notify entities consulted in paragraph (2), the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, the Senate Committees on Appropriations, Budget and Fiscal Review, and Health, and the Assembly Committees on Appropriations,
 Budget, and Health, within 10 business days of that modification or adjustment.

(4) The department shall work with the affected entities and the Legislature to make the necessary statutory changes.

(g) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Comprehensive risk contract” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 438.2 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, charter school, the California Schools for the Deaf, and the California School for the Blind.

(3) “Medi-Cal managed care plan” means an individual, organization, or entity that enters into a comprehensive risk
 contract with the department to provide covered full-scope health care services to enrolled Medi-Cal beneficiaries pursuant to any provision of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) of Part 3 of Division 9.

(4) “Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery system” has the meaning described in subdivision (i) of Section 14184.101.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 355.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

5961.4.

(a) As a component of the initiative, the State Department of Health Care Services shall develop and maintain a school-linked statewide fee schedule for outpatient mental health or substance use disorder treatment provided to a student 25 years of age or younger at a schoolsite.

(b) The department shall develop and maintain a school-linked statewide provider network of schoolsite behavioral health counselors.

(c) (1) Commencing January 1, 2024, and subject to subdivision (h), each Medi-Cal managed care plan and Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery system, as applicable, shall reimburse providers of medically necessary outpatient mental health or substance use disorder
 treatment provided at a schoolsite to a student 25 years of age or younger who is an enrollee of the plan or delivery system, in accordance with paragraph (2), but only to the extent the Medi-Cal managed care plan or Medi-Cal behavioral delivery system is financially responsible for those schoolsite services under its approved managed care contract with the department.

(2) Providers of medically necessary schoolsite services described in this section shall be reimbursed, at a minimum, at the fee schedule rate or rates developed pursuant to subdivision (a), regardless of network provider status.

(d) (1) The department may contract with an entity to administer the school-linked statewide behavioral health provider network in accordance with this subdivision.

(2) The entity that administers the
 school-linked statewide behavioral health provider network shall do all of the following:

(A) Create and administer a process for enrolling and credentialing all eligible practitioners and providers seeking to provide medically necessary schoolsite services described in this section.

(B) Create and administer a process for the submission and reimbursement of claims eligible to be reimbursed pursuant to this section, which may include resolving disputes related to the school-linked statewide all-payer fee schedule and administering fee collection pursuant to subdivision (g).

(C) (i) Create and administer a mechanism for the sharing of data between the entity contracted pursuant to this
 subdivision and a health care service plan, insurer, or Medi-Cal managed care plan that covers medically necessary schoolsite services subject to the school-linked statewide all-payer fee schedule that is necessary to facilitate timely claims processing, payment, and reporting, avoid duplication of claims, allow for tracking of grievance remediation, and to facilitate coordination of care and continuity of care for enrollees.

(ii) Clause (i) includes requiring the entity that administers the school-linked statewide behavioral health provider network to automate, to the maximum extent possible, matching student records with health plan enrollment information, in order to reduce or eliminate the administrative burden of collecting health plan enrollment data from individual students and families on local educational agencies and institutions of higher
 education.

(iii) The department shall require any entity administering the school-linked statewide behavioral health provider network to ensure both of the following:

(I) Claims submitted pursuant to Section 1374.722 of the Health and Safety Code, Section 10144.53 of the Insurance Code, and subdivisions (c) and (f) are properly reimbursed according to applicable claim payment deadlines.

(II) The deadline for a local educational agency or institutions of higher education to submit a retroactive claim for payment is the longer of the time permitted under either federal or state law.

(e) A provider or practitioner of medically necessary schoolsite services participating in the school-linked statewide behavioral health provider
 network described in this section shall do all of the following:

(1) Comply with all administrative requirements necessary to be enrolled and credentialed, as applicable, by the entity that administers the school-linked statewide behavioral health provider network.

(2) Submit all claims for reimbursement for services billed under the school-linked statewide all-payer fee schedule through the entity that administers the school-linked statewide behavioral health provider network.

(3) If a provider or practitioner of medically necessary schoolsite services has, or enters into, a direct agreement established with a health care service plan, insurer, or Medi-Cal managed care plan that covers medically necessary schoolsite services outside of the school-linked statewide all-payer fee schedule, they shall be allowed to bill
 for services provided directly under the terms of the established agreement.

(f) (1) A health care service plan, insurer, or Medi-Cal managed care plan that covers medically necessary schoolsite services subject to the school-linked statewide all-payer fee schedule, pursuant to Section 1374.722 of the Health and Safety Code, Section 10144.53 of the Insurance Code, and this section, shall comply with all administrative requirements necessary to cover and reimburse those services set forth by the entity that administers the school-linked statewide behavioral health provider network.

(2) If an agreement exists between a health care service plan, insurer, or Medi-Cal managed care plan and a provider or practitioner of medically necessary schoolsite services outside of the school-linked statewide all-payer fee schedule, the health care service plan, insurer, or
 Medi-Cal managed care plan shall do all of the following:

(A) At minimum, reimburse the contracted provider or practitioner at the school-linked statewide all-payer fee schedule rates.

(B) Provide to the department data deemed necessary and appropriate for program reporting and compliance purposes.

(C) Comply with all administrative requirements necessary to cover and reimburse medically necessary schoolsite services subject to the school-linked statewide all-payer fee schedule, as determined by the department.

(g) (1) The department shall establish and charge a fee to participating health care service plans, insurers, or Medi-Cal managed care plans to cover the reasonable cost of administering the school-linked statewide
 behavioral health provider network.

(2) The department shall set the fees in an amount that it projects is sufficient to cover all administrative costs incurred by the state associated with implementing this section and consider the assessed volume of claims and providers or practitioners of medically necessary schoolsite services that are credentialed and enrolled by the entity contracted pursuant to subdivision (d).

(3) The department shall not assess the fee authorized by this subdivision until the time that the contract between the department and the entity contracted pursuant to subdivision (d) commences.

(4) (A) The department may periodically update the amount and structure of the fees, as necessary, to provide sufficient funding for the purpose specified in this subdivision.

(B) The fees authorized in this paragraph shall be evaluated annually and based on the state’s projected costs for the forthcoming fiscal year.

(C) If the department proposes to increase the fees, it shall notify the Legislature of the proposed increase through the submission of the semiannual Medi-Cal estimate provided to the Legislature.

(5) (A) (i) The Behavioral Health Schoolsite Fee Schedule Administration Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury.

(ii) The department shall administer the Behavioral Health Schoolsite Fee Schedule Administration Fund consistent with this subdivision.

(B) All revenues, less refunds, derived from the fees
 authorized in this subdivision shall be deposited in the Behavioral Health Schoolsite Fee Schedule Administration Fund.

(C) The moneys in the Behavioral Health Schoolsite Fee Schedule Administration Fund shall be available upon appropriation by the Legislature and shall be used only for purposes of this subdivision.

(D) Notwithstanding Section 16305.7 of the Government Code, interest and dividends earned on moneys in the Behavioral Health Schoolsite Fee Schedule Administration Fund shall be retained in the fund and used solely for the purposes specified in this section.

(E) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Controller may use moneys in the Behavioral Health Schoolsite Fee Schedule Administration Fund for cashflow loans to the General Fund as provided in Sections 16310 and 16381 of the Government
 Code.

(F) Funds remaining in the Behavioral Health Schoolsite Fee Schedule Administration Fund at the end of a fiscal year shall be available for use in the following fiscal year and taken into consideration in establishment of fees for the subsequent fiscal year.

(h) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that the department obtains any necessary federal approvals, and federal financial participation under the Medi-Cal program is available and not otherwise jeopardized.

(i) This section does not relieve a local educational agency or institution of higher education from requirements to accommodate or provide services to students with disabilities pursuant to any applicable state and federal law, including, but not limited to, the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400
 et seq.), Part 30 (commencing with Section 56000) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code, Chapter 26.5 (commencing with Section 7570) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 3000) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(j) The California Health and Human Service Agency shall publish a policy manual to assist a local education agency with navigating the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-191) and the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g) for purposes of participating in the school-linked statewide behavioral health provider network.

(k) (1) The State Department of Health Care Services shall, not less than twice a
 year, convene a working group of stakeholders to discuss the status of, and receive feedback regarding, implementation of the fee schedule. The working group shall include, but is not limited to, representatives of all of the following:

(A) Medi-Cal managed care plans.

(B) Medi-Cal behavioral health plans.

(C) Health care service plans.

(D) Insurers.

(E) Behavioral health providers.

(F) Local educational agencies.

(G) Labor representatives of school employees.

(H) Members of the educational
 community.

(2) The department shall provide notice, and relevant updates and information on the status of the implementation of the fee schedule, to all of the following:

(A) The Assembly Committee on Budget.

(B) The Assembly Committee on Education.

(C) The Assembly Committee on Health.

(D) The Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review.

(E) The Senate Committee on Education.

(F) The Senate Committee on Health.

(3) This subdivision shall become inoperative on July 1, 2030.

(l) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Comprehensive risk contract” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 438.2 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) “Institution of higher education” means the California Community Colleges, the California State University, or the University of California.

(3) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, charter school, the California Schools for the Deaf, and the California School for the Blind.

(4) “Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery system” has the meaning described in subdivision (i) of Section 14184.101.

(5) “Medi-Cal managed care plan” means any individual, organization, or entity that enters into a comprehensive risk contract with the department to provide covered full-scope health care services to enrolled Medi-Cal beneficiaries pursuant to any provision of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) of Part 3 of Division 9.

(6) “Schoolsite” has the meaning described in
 paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 1374.722 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 105, Sec. 49.   (AB 144)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5961.5.

(a) As a component of the initiative, the State Department of Health Care Services shall develop and select evidence-based interventions and community-defined promising practices to improve outcomes for children and youth with, or at high risk for, behavioral health conditions.

(b) Prior to selecting the evidence-based interventions, as described in subdivision (a), the department shall establish a workgroup comprised of subject matter experts and affected stakeholders to consider evidence-based interventions based on robust evidence for effectiveness, impact on racial equity, and sustainability.

(c) The department, or its contracted vendor, shall provide competitive grants to entities it deems
 qualified to support the implementation of the evidence-based interventions and community-defined promising practices developed pursuant to subdivision (a).

(d) Subject to subdivision (e), entities eligible to receive grants pursuant to this section may include Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery systems, city mental health authorities, tribal entities, health care service plans, Medi-Cal managed care plans, community-based organizations, and behavioral health providers.

(e) The department shall determine the eligibility criteria, grant application process, and methodology for the distribution of funds appropriated for the purposes described in this section to those entities it deems qualified.

(f) As a condition of funding, grant recipients shall share standardized data, in a manner and form determined by the
 department.

(g) For purposes of this section, “Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery system” shall have the same meaning as specified in subdivision (i) of Section 14184.101.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 61.   (SB 184)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Behavioral Health Modernization Act [5963. - 5963.06.]



  ARTICLE 2. Behavioral Health Planning and Reporting [5963. - 5963.06.]

5963.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that this article establish the Integrated Plan for Behavioral Health Services and Outcomes, which each county shall develop every three years to include all of the following:

(1) A demonstration of how the county will utilize various funds for behavioral health services to deliver high-quality, culturally responsive, and timely care along the continuum of services in the least restrictive setting from prevention and wellness in schools and other settings
 to community-based outpatient care, residential care, crisis care, acute care, and housing services and supports.

(2) A demonstration of how the county will use Behavioral Health Services Act funds to prioritize addressing the needs of those who meet both of the following:

(A) Chronically homeless, experiencing unsheltered homelessness, or are at risk of homelessness, are incarcerated or at risk of being incarcerated, are reentering the community from prison, jail, or a correctional facility, or at risk of institutionalization, conservatorship, or are in the child welfare or adult protective system.

(B) The criteria for eligible adults and older adults, as defined in Section 5892, or for eligible children and
 youth, as defined in Section 5892. 

(3) A demonstration of how the county will strategically invest in early intervention and advancing behavioral health innovation. 

(4) A demonstration of how the county has considered other local program planning efforts in the development of the integrated plan to maximize opportunities to leverage funding and services from other programs, including federal funding, Medi-Cal managed care, and commercial health plans.

(5) A demonstration of how the county will support and retain a robust, diverse county and noncounty contracted behavioral health workforce to achieve the statewide and local behavioral health outcome goals.

(6) A development process in partnership with local stakeholders.

(7) A set of measures used to track progress and hold counties accountable in meeting specific outcomes and goals of the integrated plan, including outcomes and goals that reduce disparities.

(8) Information for the state to consider, if necessary, to recommend changes to the county’s integrated plan or requiring sanctions to a county’s Behavioral Health Services Act funding as a result of a county not meeting its obligations or state outcome metrics.

(b) For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Chronically homeless” means an individual or family that is
 chronically homeless, as defined in Section 11360 of Title 42 of the United States Code, or as otherwise modified or expanded by the State Department of Health Care Services.

(2) “Department” means the State Department of Health Care Services.

(3) “Experiencing homelessness or are at risk of homelessness” means people who are homeless or at risk of homelessness, as defined in Section 91.5 of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or as otherwise defined by the department.

(4) “Integrated plan” means the Integrated Plan for Behavioral Health Services and Outcomes required by this section.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, new and ongoing county and behavioral health agency administrative costs to implement this article and Section 14197.71, any costs for plan development required under this article that exceed the amounts set forth in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 5892, and any costs for reporting required by this article that exceed the amounts set forth in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 5892, shall be included in the Governor’s 2024–25 May Revision. The State Department of Health Care Services shall consult with the California State Association of Counties and the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California no later than March 15, 2024, to estimate the resources needed to implement this article and Section 14197.71.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 109.   (SB 326)   Effective April 17, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the March 5, 2024, election.     Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Sec. 117 of Proposition 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5963.01.

(a) A county shall work with each Medi-Cal managed care plan, as defined in subdivision (j) of Section 14184.101, that covers residents of the county on development of the managed care plan’s population needs assessment.

(b) A county shall work with its local health jurisdiction on development of its community health improvement plan.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 109.   (SB 326)   Effective April 17, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the March 5, 2024, election.     Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5963.02.

(a) (1) Each county shall prepare and submit an integrated plan and annual updates to the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission and the department.

(2) All references to the three-year program and expenditure plan mean the integrated plan.

(3) Each county’s board of supervisors shall approve the integrated plan and annual updates by June 30 prior to the fiscal year or years the integrated plan or update would cover.

(4) A county shall not use the integrated plan to demonstrate compliance with federal law, state law, or requirements imposed by the department related to programs listed in
 subdivision (c).

(b) (1) Each section of the integrated plan and annual update listed in subdivision (c) shall be based on available funding or obligations under Section 30025 of the Government Code and corresponding contracts for the applicable fiscal years and in accordance with established stakeholder engagement and planning requirements as required in Section 5963.03.
